Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-2-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all the amounts deducted from the earnable compensation of a member or paid by the member to establish or reestablish credit for service, which amounts are credited to the member’s individual account in the annuity savings fund, together with regular interest thereon. Beginning July 1, 1980, “accumulated contributions” also includes the amount of employee contributions paid by the employer on behalf of the employee and credited to the employee’s individual account in the annuity savings fund, together with regular interest thereon, excluding employee contributions paid by the employer or the employee for group term life insurance.

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal value when computed at regular interest upon the basis of the mortality tables last adopted by the board of trustees.

“Annuity” means annual payments for life derived from the accumulated contributions of a member.

“Annuity reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of an annuity, or benefit in lieu of an annuity, computed at regular interest upon the basis of the mortality tables last adopted by the board of trustees.

“Annuity savings fund” means the fund set forth under Code Section 47-2-51.

“Average final compensation” means the average annual earnable compensation of any employee during his or her last five years of creditable service or, if the employee has had less than five years of creditable service, his or her average annual earnable compensation during his or her total creditable service.

“Beneficiary” means any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or other benefit under this chapter.

“Board of trustees” means the board of trustees provided for in Code Section 47-2-21 to administer the retirement system.

Reserved.

Reserved.

“Court of record” means state courts, city courts, superior courts, the Georgia Court of Appeals, and the Supreme Court of Georgia handling within their jurisdiction general state law exclusively. This definition shall have no effect on creditable service determined or prior service certificates issued by the board of trustees before February 13, 1956.

“Credit” means creditable service, as defined in this Code section.

“Creditable service” means prior service plus membership service and any other service recognized as creditable service under this chapter.

“Division A” means the division within the retirement system of members who are part of the Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group, as set forth in Code Section 47-2-71.

“Earnable compensation” means the full rate of regular compensation payable to a member employee for his or her full normal working time, excluding any supplements from local funds. In cases where compensation includes maintenance, the board of trustees shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in cash. Such term shall include contributions made to a qualified transportation plan, within the meaning of Section 132(f) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, and before tax or salary deferral contributions made under Section 125, 401(k), 402(g)(3), 457, or 414(h) of the federal Internal Revenue Code to this retirement system or to any other retirement plan maintained by an employer.

“Employee” means:

Any regularly classified worker, elected or appointed officer, or employee of a state agency or any employee of a county, city-county, or city board, which agency or board is subject to the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of Title 45 and the State Personnel Board, including a merit system for employees of the Department of Public Safety;

Any employee or officer of any other department, bureau, board, institution, or commission of the state:

Which department, bureau, board, or commission operates under a merit system of personnel administration;

Which department operates under a tenure system as established by law; or

Which department, bureau, board, or commission becomes eligible for inclusion in the retirement system by Act of the General Assembly

who receives payment for performance of personal services from the state or any department, bureau, institution, board, or commission of the state or from a county, city-county, or city board and who is employed in a position normally requiring actual performance of duty during not less than nine months of the year. “Employee” shall not include members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, members of the Public School Employees Retirement System, any person on the payroll of a third party with whom an employer has contracted for the provision of such person’s services, or any person classified by an employer as other than a common law employee for federal tax purposes, even if a court, tribunal, or administrative agency determines that such person is a common law employee and not an independent contractor for federal tax purposes; or

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any and all civilians who are employed in or with the Army National Guard of Georgia and the Air National Guard of Georgia shall, upon establishment of a merit system for such civilian employees and upon the approval of the adjutant general, be entitled to the retirement allowances, benefits, and privileges provided by this chapter, notwithstanding that such employees may be paid by federal funds. No credit shall accrue to such civilian employees for any service rendered prior to the effective date of coverage under the retirement system. The adjutant general is authorized to make such arrangements and agreements as may be necessary or proper in order to effect deductions from the salaries or wages of such civilian employees as may be necessary or proper in the administration of the retirement system as to such civilian employees. It is the intent of the General Assembly that such persons be included in this definition only if federal funds are available for payment of employer contributions for such employees and other expenses of participation.

(16.1)

“Employee” may include new certified professional personnel employed on and after July 1, 1983, for the first time by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education only if such personnel elect membership in the retirement system pursuant to subsection (h) of Code Section 47-3-60. As used in this paragraph, the term “certified professional personnel” shall have the meaning provided for in paragraph (8.1) of Code Section 47-3-1.

(16.2)

“Employee” shall not include certified professional personnel who are in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 and who are employed by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education and who elect to become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to the authority of subsection (i) of Code Section 47-3-60. As used in this paragraph, the term “certified professional personnel” shall have the meaning provided for in paragraph (8.1) of Code Section 47-3-1.

(16.3)

“Employee” may include persons employed on and after July 1, 1987, for the first time by the Technical College System of Georgia or by postsecondary vocational-technical schools governed by the Technical College System of Georgia only if such personnel elect membership in the retirement system pursuant to subsection (j) of Code Section 47-3-60.

(16.4)

“Employee” shall not include persons who are employed by the Technical College System of Georgia or by a postsecondary vocational-technical school governed by the Technical College System of Georgia and who elect to become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to the authority of subsection (j) of Code Section 47-3-60.

(16.5)

“Employee” shall not include personnel employed by the State Board of Education or by the State Department of Education who are authorized to elect and elect to become or remain members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to applicable provisions of Chapter 3 of this title.

(16.6)

“Employee” shall not include an individual classified by an employer as an independent contractor or a leased employee within the meaning of Section 414(n) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, even if such individual is later reclassified by the Internal Revenue Service as a common law employee.

“Employer” means:

The state or any department, bureau, institution, board, or commission of the state or any county, city-county, or city board, the employees of which are subject to the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of Title 45 and the State Personnel Board, including a merit system for employees of the Department of Public Safety, and all state departments under a tenure system as established by law, provided that such county, city-county, or city board may notify the board of trustees that it will not participate in the benefits of the retirement system, such notice to be given in writing on or before the commencement date or before persons are employed by it. Any employee of a county, city-county, or city board having an existing local retirement system may elect to continue to participate in such existing local system but shall not participate in two systems, and his or her election shall be final on the commencement date under this chapter. Any county, city-county, or city employee who elects to become a member of this retirement system and who was a member of an existing local retirement system shall transfer to the board of trustees any equity he or she has in the local system;

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the adjutant general is authorized, though not directed, to establish a merit system and to perform all of the duties and obligations of an “employer” for all civilians employed in or with the Army National Guard of Georgia and the Air National Guard of Georgia, even though such employees may be paid with federal funds. The adjutant general is further authorized to make and enter into such agreements and take such actions as are necessary to provide for all contributions and payments specified in this chapter, from funds made available by the federal government, and otherwise to comply with this chapter so as to make this chapter applicable to such civilian employees; or

Any new state agency described under Code Section 47-2-70.1 and any other entity authorized by law to report any of its employees as members of this system.

“Expense fund” means the fund set forth under Code Section 47-2-60.

“Group term life insurance” means the survivors benefits established under Code Section 47-2-128.

“Involuntary separation from employment without prejudice” means separation or release from service other than by the willing choice of a member, provided that such member has not been convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of any crime involving moral turpitude or malfeasance in office or has not been forced to make restitution for any funds or property wrongfully taken by the member. Involuntary separation shall not include the defeat in an election of an elected official who becomes a member of this retirement system for the first time on or after July 1, 1971.

“Involuntary separation from employment with prejudice” means separation or release from service other than by the willing choice of a member who has been convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of a crime involving moral turpitude or malfeasance in office or who has been forced to make restitution for any funds or property wrongfully taken by the member.

“Medical board” means the board of physicians established under Code Section 47-2-24 for the purpose of arranging for and passing upon medical examinations required under this chapter.

“Member” means any employee included in the membership of this retirement system. On and after July 1, 1967, no employee shall become a member unless his or her position with an employer, as defined in paragraph (17) of this Code section, is his or her primary occupation and such position requires that the employee spend at least the number of hours specified in regulations adopted by the board of trustees in the actual performance of his or her duties, provided that in no case shall the number of hours be less than 30 hours per week during at least nine months of a year.

“Membership service” means service which is rendered by an employee while he or she is a member of the retirement system and for which credit is allowable under this chapter.

“Option one,” “option two,” “option three,” and “option four” mean the optional forms in which a member may elect to receive his or her retirement allowance, which options are set forth in Code Section 47-2-121.

“Pension” means periodic payments for life derived from contributions of the state.

“Pension accumulation fund” means the fund set forth in Code Section 47-2-55.

“Pension reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of a pension, or benefit in lieu of a pension, computed at regular interest upon the basis of the mortality tables last adopted by the board of trustees.

(28.1)

“Plan year” means the 12 month period beginning on July 1 of each year.

“Prior service” means service rendered prior to January 1, 1954, for which credit is allowable under this chapter.

“Prior service certificate” means the certificate issued to a member under this chapter as proof of his or her prior service.

“Regular interest” means interest at such a rate as shall be determined by the board of trustees in accordance with Code Section 47-2-26, which interest shall be compounded annually.

“Retirement” means withdrawal from service with a retirement allowance granted under this chapter.

“Retirement allowance” means the sum of the annuity and the pension, or any optional benefit payable in lieu thereof. All retirement allowances shall be payable in equal monthly installments, except that the board of trustees may adopt regulations providing for the payment of a lump sum, not to exceed the equivalent actuarial value of the retirement allowance, in lieu of a retirement allowance of less than $10.00 per month or in lieu of part of an annuity.

“Retirement system” means the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

“Service” means service rendered as an employee and paid for by an employer.

“Service credit” means creditable service, as defined in this Code section.

“Within one year after discharge from the armed forces” means within one year after the termination of the member’s active service in the military or naval forces of the United States and shall not include any military reserve or naval reserve service.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 349, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 160, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 101, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 143, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 195, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 96, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1859, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1543, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 575, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1351, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1742, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 52, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, §§ 3, 4/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 93, § 1/SB 466; Ga. L. 2008, p. 562, § 1/SB 434; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, §§ 9-12/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, §§ 3, 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 2/HB 805.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Technical College System of Georgia” for “Department of Technical and Adult Education” twice in paragraphs (16.3) and (16.4).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in subparagraphs (16)(A) and (17)(A), substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “state merit system of personnel administration” and, in paragraph (16.2), substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration”. The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, in paragraph (1), substituted “earnable compensation of a member or paid by the member to establish or reestablish credit for service, which amounts are credited to the member’s” for “compensation of a member and credited to his” in the first sentence and added “, excluding employee contributions paid by the employer or the employee for group term life insurance” at the end of the second sentence; in paragraph (15), inserted “or her” in the middle of the first sentence and added the last sentence; in paragraph (17), in subparagraph (17)(A), inserted “or her” in the second sentence and inserted “or she” in the third sentence, and added subparagraph (17)(C); and added paragraphs (16.6) and (28.1).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Reserved.” for the former provisions of paragraph (9), which read: “ ‘Commencement date affecting employers operating under a merit system of personnel administration at the time of the passage of this chapter’ means January 1, 1950. Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any employee of an employer which is not operating under the retirement system who, without a break in service, becomes an employee of an employer which is operating under the retirement system, within two years of the commencement date affecting such employer, shall have a commencement date as of the date employment with the latter department became effective; and in such cases all other dates found in this chapter shall be set in the same relation to his commencement date as they would otherwise be set in relation to the commencement date affecting such employer.”; substituted “Reserved.” for the former provisions of paragraph (10), which read: “ ‘Commencement date affecting employers that after February 3, 1949, operate under a merit system of personnel administration or those employers for which funds are not available on that date under Code Section 47-2-57’ means: if the employees of any employer shall hereafter become eligible for inclusion in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the commencement date set for such employer by the board of trustees shall be not less than six months or more than 12 months from the date such employer becomes eligible for membership; and all other dates mentioned in this chapter shall be set in the same relation to this commencement date as they would otherwise be set in relation to the commencement date in the original chapter, provided that in the application of dates to subsection (a) of Code Section 47-2-96, no date shall be later than July 1, 1953. Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any employee of an employer which is not operating under the retirement system who, without a break in service, becomes an employee of an employer which is operating under the retirement system, within two years of the commencement date affecting such employer, shall have a commencement date as of the date employment with the latter employer became effective; and in such cases all other dates found in this chapter shall be set in the same relation to his commencement date as they would otherwise be set in relation to the commencement date affecting such employer.”; in paragraph (14), substituted “means the division” for “and ‘Division B’ mean the divisions” at the beginning and deleted “, and those who are not, respectively” following “Section 47-2-71” at the end; substituted “Section” for “Sections” near the end of paragraph (15); and, substituted “under the State Personnel Administration” for “under a State Personnel Administration” in subparagraphs (16)(A) and (17)(A).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “or her” throughout this Code section; substituted “the employee” for “he” in paragraph (6); substituted “subject to the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of Title 45 and the State Personnel Board” for “under the State Personnel Administration” in subparagraph (16)(A); added “or” at the end of the undesignated language following division (16)(B)(iii); substituted “as defined by Code Section 45-20-2” for “of the State Personnel Administration” in the first sentence of paragraph (16.2); in subparagraph (17)(A), substituted “subject to the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of Title 45 and the State Personnel Board” for “under the State Personnel Administration” in the first sentence and substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of the last sentence; substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (17)(B); substituted “Any” for “ ‘Employer’ shall include any” in subparagraph (17)(C); and inserted “or she” in paragraph (24).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, the term “Employee” in paragraph (16.1) was placed in quotations.

Editor’s notes.

Section 5 of the 1984 Act provided that this Act would become effective on January 1, 1985, only if a proposed amendment (see Ga. L. 1984, p. 1726) to the Constitution (Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. VI) authorizing the General Assembly to revise provisions of public retirement or pension systems relating to involuntary separation from employment were ratified at the 1984 general election. Such approval was given at that election.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “Pursuant to the authority of the proposed constitutional amendment described in Section 5 of this Act and being contingent for its effectiveness on January 1, 1985, upon the ratification of such proposed constitutional amendment, this Act is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-2-2.
Involuntary separation from employment; grounds and procedures for discharge of employees.

The provisions of this Code section are supplemental to, and not in lieu of, the provisions of paragraphs (20) and (21) of Code Section 47-2-1 defining “involuntary separation from employment without prejudice” and “involuntary separation from employment with prejudice.”

The word “employee” as defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall include any such employee in the classified or unclassified service of the state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45. The provisions of that law or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto relative to the dismissal of employees from employment shall not be applicable to the discharge of an employee from employment pursuant to the provisions of this Code section. Any such employee who is otherwise subject to that law and rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall continue to be subject thereto for the purpose of any adverse personnel action other than discharge from employment or suspension pursuant to this Code section, but for the purposes of such discharge from employment or suspension, the provisions of this Code section shall be exclusive.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Duties” means duties and responsibilities assigned by an employer to an employee which are reasonably related to the lawful objectives and responsibilities of the employer and which are reasonably related to the position of employment held by the employee for which the employee is compensated.

“Employee” means an employee, other than an elected public official, a public official selected by a vote of a board to serve at the pleasure of the board, or a public official appointed pursuant to law for a specific term of office, as defined in paragraph (16) of Code Section 47-2-1 who was a member of the retirement system prior to April 1, 1972, and who, if involuntarily separated from employment without prejudice, has sufficient membership service under the retirement system to qualify for a retirement allowance because of such involuntary separation from employment.

“Employer” means any person or group of persons authorized by law or having authority delegated by law to discharge an employee.

“Insubordination” means the refusal by an employee to carry out the employee’s duties when instructed to do so by the employer or by the employee’s supervisor upon the instructions or under the authority of the employer.

“Irresponsible performance of duties” means the performance of any duties by an employee or the use of an employee’s position of employment for any one or more of the following purposes:

To make a financial gain or receive materials or services having financial value, except compensation received as an employee, under circumstances which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the financial gain or the receipt of materials or services was improperly related to the performance of duties by the employee;

To purchase or authorize the purchase of materials or services from public funds when the employee knows or reasonably could be expected to know that the amount paid for such materials or services unreasonably exceeds the amount for which substantially equivalent materials or services could be purchased without excessive delay or inconvenience;

To use publicly owned real or personal property or publicly supplied services for personal use when the employee knows or reasonably could be expected to know that such personal use of public property or services is unauthorized or improper; or

To expend or authorize the expenditure of public funds in a manner which would lead a reasonable person to believe the employee shows a reckless disregard for the obligation to taxpayers to expend public funds in a prudent and efficient manner.

“Malingering” means frequent absences from work or the failure to perform duties during working hours because of claims of illness which are unsubstantiated as determined pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section.

“Neglect of duty” means the repeated failure by an employee to carry out the employee’s duties, either because of excessive unexcused absences from work or a failure to perform or the unsatisfactory performance of duties while at work or a combination thereof.

“Proof of illness” means a written opinion by one or more physicians designated by the medical board provided for by Code Section 47-2-24 stating that an employee’s absences from work or unsatisfactory performance of duties are reasonably related to an illness suffered by the employee and describing the nature of such illness.

“Unsatisfactory performance of duties in a willful manner” means the unsatisfactory performance of duties by an employee when the past satisfactory performance of duties by the employee indicates the employee’s unsatisfactory performance is willful as determined pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section.

An employee may be discharged from employment pursuant to the requirements of this Code section for insubordination, irresponsible performance of duties, malingering, neglect of duty, or unsatisfactory performance of duties in a willful manner or for any combination of such reasons. Any employee so discharged from employment shall not be entitled to and shall not receive a retirement benefit based on involuntary separation from employment without prejudice pursuant to Code Section 47-2-123.

An employer shall have a reasonable basis for believing an employee is malingering when:

The employee has a pattern of absences from work because of illness or unsatisfactory performance of duties because of illness or a pattern of absences from work and unsatisfactory performance of duties because of illness;

The employer has requested the employee, in writing, to provide proof of illness and the employee has been given a reasonable opportunity, which shall not be less than 30 days after the date of the request made by the employer, to respond to the employer’s request; and

The employee has provided no or unsatisfactory proof of illness to the employer in response to the request made pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.

An employer shall have a reasonable basis for believing an employee is engaging in unsatisfactory performance of duties in a willful manner when:

The past work history of the employee indicates the employee is capable of satisfactory performance of duties;

The unsatisfactory performance of duties became increasingly apparent after the employee qualified for a retirement benefit based on involuntary separation from employment without prejudice; and

The employee does not claim illness as a basis for unsatisfactory performance of duties and has offered no proof of illness to the employer.

When an employer is considering the discharge from employment of an employee for any one or more reasons specified in subsection (d) of this Code section, the employer shall transmit a written notice to the employee containing the following:

An explanation of the conduct or deficiencies of the employee which form the basis for the employer’s considering the discharge of the employee;

A statement that such conduct may result in the employee’s discharge from employment on a specified date, which shall not be earlier than the tenth day following the date of the notice in the case of insubordination or irresponsible performance of duties and not earlier than the thirtieth day following the date of the notice if the basis for considering the discharge of the employee is for a reason or reasons other than insubordination or irresponsible performance of duties;

A statement that the employee’s discharge from employment for the reasons specified in the notice shall not constitute involuntary separation from employment without prejudice within the meaning of the applicable provisions of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and that if discharged, the employee shall not be entitled to receive and shall not receive a retirement benefit based on involuntary separation from employment without prejudice;

A statement that the employee has a right to a hearing before the employer on a specified date, which shall be at least five days prior to the date specified for the employee’s discharge from employment; and

A statement that at the hearing before the employer, the employee shall be given an opportunity to offer explanations for the employee’s conduct or deficiencies and to present evidence on the employee’s behalf.

An employee being considered for discharge from employment because of insubordination or irresponsible performance of duties may be suspended without pay, except to the extent the employee has accumulated annual leave, pending the completion of the procedures provided for in subsections (g) and (i) of this Code section. If the employer’s final decision is not to discharge the employee or if the employee’s discharge is not upheld by the court upon judicial review provided for in Code Section 47-2-3, the compensation denied to the employee during suspension shall be reimbursed to the employee and, if applicable, accumulated leave used during the suspension shall be reinstated.

If an employee subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this Code section fails to respond to the notice sent to the employee pursuant to said subsection or if the employer is not satisfied with the explanation made by the employee for the conduct or deficiencies specified in said notice and is not satisfied with the evidence presented in the employee’s behalf, the employee may be discharged from employment on the date specified in said notice or on such later date as shall be specified in writing by the employer to the employee. The employee shall be notified, in writing, of the final decision of the employer and such notice shall provide an explanation for the employer’s decision.

An employer discharging an employee pursuant to this Code section shall prepare a written report to the board of trustees on the discharge of the employee. Any notices or other written communications to the employee which relate to the employer’s decision to discharge the employee shall be attached to and made a part of the employer’s report to the board of trustees.

It shall be the duty of any employer considering the discharge of an employee for any reason or combination of reasons specified in subsection (d) of this Code section to follow the procedures specified in this Code section as a condition precedent to the discharge of such employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 3/HB 805.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “state system of personnel administration” for “State Personnel Administration” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 2, enacted this Code section. Section 5 of the 1984 Act provided that this Act would become effective on January 1, 1985, only if a proposed amendment (see Ga. L. 1984, p. 1726) to the Constitution (Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. VI) authorizing the General Assembly to revise provisions of public retirement or pension systems relating to involuntary separation from employment were ratified at the 1984 general election. Such approval was given at that election.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1296, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “Pursuant to the authority of the proposed constitutional amendment described in Section 5 of this Act and being contingent for its effectiveness on January 1, 1985, upon the ratification of such proposed constitutional amendment, this Act is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law.’ ”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).